Louisiana, session 2026, HB99.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:95(A)(4)(a) and (b)(introductory paragraph), 95.2(A), (B)(3), and
(C)(introductory paragraph), and 95.6(C)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
14:95(A)(4)(b)(iv), 95.2(C)(10), and 95.11 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§95. Illegal carrying of weapons
A. Illegal carrying of weapons is any of the following:
* * *
(4)(a) The intentional possession or use by any person of a dangerous
weapon on a school campus during regular school hours or on a school bus.
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-201 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 99
"School" means any elementary, secondary, or high school, or vocational-technical
school in this state and "campus" means all facilities and property within the
boundary of the school property. "School" does not mean a vocational-technical
school that is privately owned. "School bus" means any motor bus being used to
transport children to and from school or in connection with school activities.
(b) The provisions of this Paragraph shall do not apply to any of the
following:
* * *
(iv) Any individual authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to R.S. 14:95.11.
* * *
§95.2. Carrying a firearm or dangerous weapon by a student or nonstudent on
school property, at school-sponsored functions, or in a firearm-free zone;
exceptions
A. Carrying Except as provided in R.S. 14:95.11, carrying a firearm, or
dangerous weapon as defined in R.S. 14:2, by a student or nonstudent on school
property, at a school sponsored school-sponsored function, or in a firearm-free zone
is unlawful and shall be defined as possession of any firearm or dangerous weapon,
on one's person, at any time while on a school campus, on school transportation, or
at any school sponsored school-sponsored function in a specific designated area
including but not limited to athletic competitions, dances, parties, or any
extracurricular activities, or within one thousand feet of any school campus.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following words have the following
meanings:
* * *
(3)(a) "School" means any elementary, secondary, high school, or
vocational-technical school, college, or university in this state.
(b) "School" does not mean any of the following:
(i) A vocational-technical school in this state that is privately owned.
(ii) A public college or university in this state.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-201 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 99
(iii) A private or independent college or university in this state that is a
recipient of any state funding.
* * *
C. The provisions of this Section shall do not apply to any of the following:
* * *
(10) Any person who is eighteen years of age or older, is lawfully permitted
to possess a firearm pursuant to state and federal law, and who carries a firearm on
the campus or in any building or facility on the campus of a public college or
university in this state or a private or independent college or university that is a
recipient of any state funding.
* * *
§95.6. Firearm-free zone; notice; signs; crime; penalties
* * *
C. For purposes of this Section:
(1)(a) "School" means any public or private elementary, secondary, high
school, or vocational-technical school, college, or university in this state.
(b) "School" does not mean any of the following:
(i) A vocational-technical school that is privately owned.
(ii) A public college or university in this state.
(iii) A private or independent college or university in this state that is a
recipient of any state funding.
* * *
§95.11. Carrying a firearm at colleges and universities
A.(1) It is the intent of the legislature to affirm that the right to keep and bear
arms is a fundamental right protected by the Second Amendment to the United States
Constitution and Article I, Section 11 of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(2) The purpose of this Section is to align the rules governing the possession
and carry of firearms on college and university campuses with existing permitless
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-201 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 99
carry laws in this state, recognizing that law-abiding citizens do not lose their rights
when they step onto a campus that receives public funds.
B.(1) Any individual who is eighteen years of age or older and who is
lawfully permitted to possess a firearm pursuant to state and federal law may carry
a firearm on the campus of any college or university in this state.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(a) "Campus" means all facilities and property within the boundary of the
college or university property.
(b) "College" or "university" means any of the following:
(i) Any institution of post-secondary education that is authorized to confer
undergraduate degrees in the arts and sciences and receives any form of state
funding.
(ii) Any institution of post-secondary education in this state that is privately
or independently owned and operated, authorized to confer undergraduate degrees
in the arts and sciences, and is a recipient of any form of state funding.
(c) "Individual" means any student, faculty, staff, contractor, or visitor of a
college or university, unless otherwise prohibited by law.
C.(1) The provisions of this Section do not permit an individual to carry a
firearm in any of the following:
(a) Locations where firearm possession is restricted under federal law.
(b) Areas designated for any of the following:
(i) Active disciplinary or administrative hearings.
(ii) Medical or mental health treatment centers operated by the college or
university.
(iii) Events with security screening or controlled access when signs that
indicate the existence of such areas are posted pursuant to R.S. 14:95.6.
(2) Private facilities or classrooms within the college or university may
restrict the carrying of a firearm if signs are properly posted pursuant to R.S. 14:95.6.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-201 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 99
D. No student, faculty member, staff member, or visitor shall be subject to
discipline, penalty, or retaliation solely for carrying a firearm pursuant to this
Section.
Section 2. R.S. 17:3129.11, 3351.23, and 5068.1 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§3129.11. Carrying of a firearm at public colleges and universities
The Board of Regents shall not adopt, enact, or enforce a policy that does any
of the following:
(a) Requires any student, faculty, staff, contractor, or visitor to register his
firearm or declare his eligibility to carry a firearm with a public college or university.
(b) Imposes requirements more restrictive than state law pertaining to
additional firearm training, permits, or storage.
(c) Creates campus-specific limitations that conflict with R.S. 14:95.11.
* * *
§3351.23. Carrying of a firearm at public colleges and universities
Any management board of a public college or university, including those
listed in R.S. 17:3215 through 3217.5, or a public college or university shall not
adopt, enact, or enforce a policy that does any of the following:
(a) Requires any student, faculty, staff, contractor, or visitor to register his
firearm or declare his eligibility to carry a firearm with the public college or
university.
(b) Imposes requirements more restrictive than state law pertaining to
additional firearm training, permits, or storage.
(c) Creates campus-specific limitations that conflict with R.S. 14:95.11.
* * *
§5068.1. Enrollment of students who receive financial assistance; private or
independent colleges and universities; prohibited policies
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-201 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 99
A. No college or university that accepts a student who is a recipient of
financial assistance based on an Opportunity, Performance, Honors, or TOPS-Tech
Award shall adopt, enact, or enforce a policy that does any of the following:
(1) Requires any student, faculty, staff, contractor, or visitor to register his
firearm or declare his eligibility to carry a firearm with the college or university.
(2) Imposes requirements more restrictive than state law pertaining to
additional firearm training, permits, or storage.
(3) Creates campus-specific limitations that conflict with R.S. 14:95.11.
B. For purposes of this Section, "college or university" means an institution
of higher learning that is a member of the Louisiana Association of Independent
Colleges and Universities and that is accredited by an institutional accrediting
agency recognized by the United States Department of Education to pursue an
academic undergraduate degree.
Section 3. R.S. 40:1379.3(N)(11) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1379.3. Statewide permits for concealed handguns; application procedures;
definitions
* * *
N. No concealed handgun may be carried into and no concealed handgun
permit issued pursuant to this Section shall authorize or entitle a permittee to carry
a concealed handgun in any of the following:
* * *
(11) Any school, school campus, or school bus as defined in R.S. 14:95.6,
except as provided in R.S. 14:95.11.
* * *
Section 4. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-201 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 99